Massachusetts, session 194th, S1417.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Notwithstanding any special or general law there shall be a special commission to study 
the trafficking of heroin into and within the Commonwealth to develop recommendations on 
actions to prevent such trafficking in the future including, but not limited to legislative 
recommendations and policing recommendations. 
The special commission shall consist of: the secretary of health and human services, or 
their designee; three members to be appointed by the governor, which shall include: one person 
who is a police officer specializing in opiates, one person who is a stakeholder within a retail 
pharmacy company, and one member of the general citizenry impacted by the opiate epidemic; 
two members of the House of Representatives, one of whom to be appointed by the Speaker of 
the House of Representatives, and the other to be appointed by the minority leader; two members 

of 2 11 of the Senate, one of whom to be appointed by the President of the Senate, and the other to be 
appointed by the minority leader; the director of the bureau of substance abuse services or their 
designee; provided, however, that the first meeting of the commission shall take place not later 
than December 1, 2025. 
The special commission shall submit its recommendations, together with drafts of any 
legislation, to the clerks of the House of Representatives and the Senate, the chairs of the joint 
committee on mental health and substance abuse not later than December 1, 2026.